Wisconsin, session 2025, SB719.
do enact as follows:SB719,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.SB719,2,24(1) Veterans benefits management system; increase to segregated 5fund. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 6of veterans affairs under s. 20.485 (2) (u), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 7is increased by $1,887,200 and the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is 1increased by $3,132,400 for the purchase and ongoing maintenance of a new cloud-2based grant administration system for veterans benefits programs.SB719,2,33